District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.72a

Repealed

Merger or consolidation — Domestic corporation and limited partnership.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 72a
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(z), 39 DCR 4863
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-38, § 4(a), 42 DCR 3269
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.72a.
1981 Ed., § 29-372.1.